Washington statutes.
RCW 2.68.060

Duties of the administrative office of the courts.

The administrative office of the courts, under the direction of the judicial information system committee, shall:

(1) Develop a judicial information system information technology portfolio consistent with the provisions of RCW 43.105.341;

(2) Participate in the development of an enterprise-based statewide information technology strategy;

(3) Ensure the judicial information system information technology portfolio is organized and structured to clearly indicate participation in and use of enterprise-wide information technology strategies;

(4) As part of the biennial budget process, submit the judicial information system information technology portfolio to the chair and ranking member of the ways and means committees of the house of representatives and the senate, the office of financial management, and Washington technology solutions.

[ 2024 c 54 s 24; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 403; 2015 c 225 s 4; 2010 c 282 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 401-405, 409, 411, and 412: See note following RCW 2.36.057.